Montana, session 2025, HB789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-37-240, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-240. Surplus campaign funds. (1) A candidate shall dispose of any surplus funds from the
candidate's campaign within 120 days after the time of filing the closing campaign report pursuant to 13-37-228.
In Except as provided in subsection (2), in disposing of the surplus funds, a candidate may not contribute the
funds to another campaign, including the candidate's own future campaign, or use the funds for personal
benefit.
(2) A legislative candidate may contribute up to $10,000 in surplus campaign funds to the
candidate's own future campaign within 120 days after the closing campaign report is filed. This constitutes a
contribution from the candidate to the future campaign and not a contribution from any original contributor in the
past campaign. A candidate may not treat the contribution as a loan.
(3) A successful candidate for a statewide elected or legislative office or for public service
commissioner may establish a continuing service account as provided in 13-37-402.
(4) The A candidate shall provide a supplement to the closing campaign report to the
commissioner showing the disposition of any surplus campaign funds.
(2)(5) For the purposes of this section, "personal benefit" means a use that will provide a direct or
indirect benefit of any kind to the candidate or any member of the candidate's immediate family."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 789